Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-101
Terms, usage.

Unless otherwise provided, words used in this code in the present tense include the future as well as the present. Words used in the masculine gender comprehend as well the feminine and neuter. The singular number includes the plural and the plural the singular. The term writing includes printing. The term oath includes an affirmation.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 246, p. 781;

R.S.1913, § 8901;

C.S.1922, § 9922;

C.S.1929, § 29-101;

R.S.1943, § 29-101.

In construction of criminal code, singular number includes the plural. Follmer v. State, 94 Neb. 217, 142 N.W. 908 (1913).